Hawaii statutes.
[§633-31] Jury trial; demand; assignment to
other court. In a case filed or pending in the small claims division of
the district court in which a party entitled to a trial by jury files a demand
therefor, the case shall be assigned to and tried in the circuit court under
the procedure provided for jury trials. [L 1970, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next